Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 41
ORGANIZATION AND POWERS

Cross references:

For electronic funds transfers for financial institutions organized under this article 41, see article 48 of this title 11.

Section

11-41-101. General organization.

Domestic associations may be incorporated with shares or stock or both and with all the rights, powers, and privileges and subject to all the restrictions set forth in articles 40 to 46 of this title.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 287, § 1.

CSA:

C. 25, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-1.

11-41-102. Restriction on corporate name.

The name of each domestic association incorporated on or after May 17, 1939, shall include the words "savings and loan association". If the name of the domestic association contains the words "savings and loan association", it need not comply with the requirements of part 6 of article 90 of title 7, C.R.S. No association shall include in its name the words "guaranty" or "guarantee" or "mutual", unless organized without stock, or "permanent", unless organized with stock. The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any association existing before May 17, 1939, to continue the use of its name.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 287, § 2.

CSA:

C. 25, § 5.

L. 39:

p. 238, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-2.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 430, § 2, effective June 19.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 861, § 28, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 989, § 107, effective July 1.

11-41-103. Use of name "savings and loan association" restricted.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, company, association, partnership, society, or corporation, either domestic or foreign, to transact business under any name or title which contains the term "savings and loan", or use any sign or circulate or use any letterhead, billhead, circular, or paper whatsoever, or advertise in any manner to indicate that its business is the character or kind of business carried on or transacted by a savings and loan association or which is calculated to lead the public to believe that its business is that of a savings and loan association, unless it is lawfully authorized to do business in this state under the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title or its charter and is actually engaged in carrying on a savings and loan business in this state under the provisions of said articles 40 to 46, and, upon action brought by the commissioner, injunction will lie to restrain any person, firm, company, partnership, society, corporation, or agent thereof from continuing to violate any of the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 359, § 18.

CSA:

C. 25, § 86.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-3.

11-41-104. Articles of incorporation.

Any five or more persons who are citizens of this state and who may desire to form a corporation for the purpose of carrying on the business of a savings and loan association shall make, sign, and acknowledge, in triplicate, before some officer competent to take the acknowledgment of deeds, a certificate in writing, known as the articles of incorporation, in which shall be stated:

The name of said association, which shall not be identical with that of any other association in this state nor which so resembles the name of any other association as to be likely to lead to confusion as to its identity;

The objects for which the association is formed;

The name of the city or town and county in this state wherein the principal office of the association is to be located;

In the event it is a permanent stock company, the number of shares of permanent stock authorized and the number of shares of permanent stock subscribed for and the amount of cash actually paid in thereon;

The names of the incorporators, their respective occupations and residence addresses, and a statement of the number of shares or amount of stock subscribed by each and the amount of cash paid upon the shares or stock of each;

The kind or classes of shares or stock the association proposes to issue and a statement of all or any of the designations and the powers, rights, qualifications, limitations, or restrictions in respect of any classes of stock or shares of the association;

That the association shall have perpetual existence;

Whether or not cumulative voting shall be allowed in the election of directors;

That, if such is the case, the association is created for the purpose of carrying on part or all of its business beyond the limits of this state;

The number of directors and the names and residences of the directors who shall serve for the first year of its existence and until their successors are elected and qualified;

A statement as to whether the association is organized to issue and sell its shares and otherwise operate as a share association or to accept savings deposits and operate as a deposit association, as provided by the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title.

The certificate may also contain any other provisions which the incorporators may see fit to insert for the regulation and conduct of the affairs of the association, the directors, shareholders, and stockholders, or any class of shareholders or stockholders, but such provisions shall not conflict with the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title or the laws of the state of Colorado.

The provisions of this section shall be the exclusive authority for the incorporation of a domestic association, and nothing in either section 11-41-121 (1.5) or 11-41-133 (6) shall be construed or interpreted to authorize the organization of a domestic association by a foreign association by incorporation of a charter de novo.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 288, § 3.

CSA:

C. 25, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-4.

L. 69:

p. 1014, § 4.

L. 88:

(3) added, p. 457, § 1, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For persons before whom acknowledgments may be taken, see § 38-30-126.

11-41-105. Minimum stock subscription - issuance of preferred stock.

No permanent stock association shall be organized on or after July 1, 1983, unless, prior to the filing of its articles of incorporation, such minimum amount of its permanent stock and paid-in surplus as required by the commissioner has been subscribed for and the same paid for in lawful money of the United States and is in the custody of the persons named in the articles of incorporation as the members of the first board of directors.

Preferred stock may be issued by a permanent stock association at any time and shall have such preferences, powers, conversion provisions, and rights as the board of directors of the association may approve.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 289, § 4.

CSA:

C. 25, § 7.

L. 39:

p. 261, § 36.

L. 43:

p. 200, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-5.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 569, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 489, § 1, effective April 26.

11-41-106. Approval of articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation of any savings and loan association organized under articles 40 to 46 of this title shall not be filed in the office of the secretary of state of the state of Colorado or be received by the secretary of state for filing unless accompanied by a certificate of approval by the commissioner.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 290, § 5.

CSA:

C. 25, § 8.

L. 39:

p. 238, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-6.

11-41-107. Documents deposited with commissioner.

Every domestic savings and loan association proposing to incorporate in this state shall first deposit with the commissioner the following documents:

Two signed and verified copies of the articles of incorporation of the association;

Two copies of the bylaws of the association;

Applications signed and verified by a majority of the initial directors of such association, setting forth: Names and addresses of the proposed incorporators, directors, and officers of such association; a statement of the experience and general fitness of the officers and directors to engage in the savings and loan business; an itemized statement of the estimated receipts and expenditures of such association for the first year showing that such association will have a reasonable chance to succeed in the territory in which it proposes to operate; and such other matters as the commissioner may require. Such application shall be accompanied by a fee in the form of a certified check in the amount established by the commissioner, payable to the division of financial services.

Upon receipt of such documents, the commissioner shall immediately examine and investigate into the advisability of issuing a certificate of approval for such association, and he shall issue such certificate of approval if, upon examination, the commissioner finds:

That the articles of incorporation comply with all the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title;

That the bylaws comply with the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title;

That the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title have been complied with;

That it is expedient and desirable to permit such association to engage in business;

That the officers and directors have the experience and general fitness to engage in a savings and loan business;

That the financial program of the association is sound;

That the association has a probable chance to succeed;

That its name is not so similar to that of any other association operating in this state as to mislead the public; but the words "the", "and", "mutual", "permanent", and "savings and loan association" shall not themselves constitute such similarity of names as to be likely to mislead the public.

If the commissioner's finding is adverse to the association in any of the particulars recited in subsection (2) of this section, he shall not issue a certificate of approval.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 291, § 6.

CSA:

C. 25, § 9.

L. 39:

p. 238, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-7.

L. 83:

(1)(c) amended, p. 493, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1)(c) amended, p. 377, § 2, effective May 11.

L. 89:

(1)(c) amended, p. 620, § 13, effective July 1.

11-41-108. Refusal of certificate - appeal.

If the commissioner, after an examination, believes for any reason that a certificate of approval should not be issued and refuses to issue the same, he shall file a written statement with a board consisting of the governor, the attorney general, and the state treasurer of the state of Colorado giving in detail his reasons for such refusal. After notice to all concerned and after a hearing, said board may order the commissioner to issue the certificate of approval or may approve his action in refusing a certificate of approval.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 293, § 7.

CSA:

C. 25, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-8.

Cross references:

For hearing procedures, see § 24-4-105.

11-41-109. Certificate of approval - where articles filed.

If the commissioner finds affirmatively for the association upon all the matters set forth in section 11-41-107, he shall issue a certificate of approval under his hand and seal, executed in duplicate, within sixty days thereafter, in which shall be recited in substance the following:

That the articles of incorporation and bylaws have been filed in his office;

That said articles of incorporation and bylaws conform to the provisions of the law;

That he has approved the same.

The commissioner shall attach one of said certificates to each copy of the articles of incorporation and shall retain one copy of the articles of incorporation and bylaws in his office and return the other copy of the articles and bylaws, with the certificate of approval attached thereto, to the association. Upon receipt from the commissioner of the articles of incorporation, the association shall file the same with the secretary of state, and certified copies of the articles of incorporation shall be filed by the association in the office of the county clerk and recorder of each county in this state in which said association may own real estate. The failure to file a certified copy in the office of the clerk and recorder of any county in this state shall not affect the validity of the incorporation of any association which has made its filing with the secretary of state and has obtained a certificate of approval. In the event a true copy of such articles of incorporation is presented to the secretary of state with the request that the same be certified, he shall certify the same for a fee which shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S., which certificate shall contain, in addition to the usual statement, a statement that the same is a true copy of the original articles of incorporation on file in his office and a statement as to the date of the filing of such articles of incorporation. When articles of incorporation or amendments thereto have been filed in the office of the secretary of state, he shall record and carefully preserve the same in his office, and a copy thereof, duly certified by the secretary of state under the great seal of the state of Colorado, shall be evidence of the existence of such association and prima facie evidence of the contents of said articles of incorporation or such amendments thereto.

The secretary of state shall charge for the filing of documents for savings and loan associations the same fees that are charged for corporations with like capital stock, as prescribed in the "Colorado Corporation Code", and such fees shall be deposited in the department of state cash fund created in section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 293, § 8.

CSA:

C. 25, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-9.

L. 67:

p. 492, § 1.

L. 83:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 876, § 41, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

The "Colorado Corporation Code", articles 1 to 10 of title 7, referred to in subsection (3) was repealed, effective July 1, 1994, and was replaced on that date by the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of title 7.

Cross references:

For fees for filing documents under the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", see part 2 of article 101 of title 7.

11-41-110. Body corporate.

Upon making the articles of incorporation, obtaining a certificate of approval from the commissioner, filing the articles of incorporation and certificate of approval in the office of the secretary of state, and paying the filing fees therefor to the secretary of state, the persons so associating and their successors and assigns shall, from the date of the filing of the same with the office of the secretary of state, be a body corporate by the name set forth in said articles of incorporation, subject to dissolution as provided in articles 40 to 46 of this title and the laws of Colorado not in conflict with said articles 40 to 46. No association shall cease to exist or expire from neglect on the part of the association to elect officers or directors at the time mentioned in their articles of incorporation and bylaws, and all officers or directors elected by an association shall hold office until their successors are duly elected and qualified.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 295, § 9.

CSA:

C. 25, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-10.

11-41-111. Renewal of corporate life.

Any association incorporated under any law prior to June 8, 1933, may extend its corporate life upon the affirmative vote of at least a majority of its directors at a special meeting of the board of directors called for that purpose, setting out the purpose of said meeting, and ratified by the written consent of persons holding in the aggregate more than two-thirds in book value of the outstanding stock and shares in such association.

The president or vice-president and the secretary or assistant secretary of said association shall certify the fact, under the seal of said association, and shall make as many certificates as may be necessary so as to file one in the office of the county clerk and recorder in each county wherein the association may do business, one in the office of the secretary of state, and one in the office of the commissioner, and thereupon the corporate life of said association shall be renewed in perpetuity, or for the term mentioned in the certificate, upon filing such certificate in the office of the secretary of state. All stockholders or shareholders have the same rights in the new association, so extended, as they had in the association as originally formed.

The extension of the term of existence of any such association in the manner provided shall not be so construed as enlarging any of the powers, privileges, or franchises theretofore enjoyed by such association. Upon the proper filing of any certificate of extension mentioned in articles 40 to 46 of this title, the corporate existence shall be considered as extended and continuous for the period specified in such certificate from the date of the previous expiration of such corporate existence, and said association shall be considered as then having had a continuous corporate existence to the time of the filing of such certificate of renewal.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 295, § 10.

CSA:

C. 25, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-11.

11-41-112. Powers of savings and loan associations.

Savings and loan associations have the following powers:

To have succession of its corporate name;

As to all associations incorporated prior to June 8, 1933, to have existence for the period named in their articles of incorporation and, on the termination of such period, perpetually if so provided in the extension;

As to all associations incorporated under articles 40 to 46 of this title, to have existence perpetually;

To sue and be sued in any court of law or equity;

To have a corporate seal and to alter the same and use the same by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced or otherwise;

To appoint such officers and agents as the business of the association shall require and allow them reasonable compensation;

To make bylaws, not inconsistent with the constitution or laws of the United States or of this state or the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title, and alter the same at pleasure, and make all needed rules and regulations for the transaction of its business and the control of its property and affairs, if a certified copy of same has been filed with the commissioner. The bylaws of an association may be amended either by the stockholders or shareholders at their annual meeting or by the board of directors of an association at any regular meeting of the board of directors; but no change in the bylaws shall take effect until approved by the commissioner.

To acquire, hold, mortgage, and convey all such real estate and personal property as may be transferred to it in the operation of its business;

To levy, assess, and collect from its shareholders such sums of money by way of installment dues and interest on loans as the association may provide in its bylaws;

To issue and sell shares as provided in sections 11-42-101 to 11-42-106 or, in the case of deposit associations operated under the provisions of section 11-42-125, to accept savings deposits as provided by such section;

To redeem its shares and repay the funds acquired thereby with such earnings as the same may be entitled according to the terms of the issue thereof if the same are no longer required for the purposes of the association;

To act as a trustee, custodian, or manager or in any other fiduciary capacity to the same extent authorized and permitted from time to time by the laws and regulations applicable to federal savings and loan associations in Colorado, and upon specific approval by the commissioner, by permission granted such federal associations by the federal office of thrift supervision or its successor, including specifically, but without limitation, the power to act as the trustee, custodian, or manager of any trust created or organized in the United States and forming a part of a stock bonus, pension, profit-sharing, or retirement plan that is qualified for specific tax treatment under the provisions of the federal "Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Act of 1962", as from time to time amended or supplemented, or under the provisions of any other act of congress enacted after June 2, 1971, as a substitute or replacement for the federal "Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Act of 1962" or under the provisions of the federal "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974", 29 U.S.C. sec. 1001 et seq., as from time to time amended or supplemented. The association managing funds of any such plan, trust, or fund shall have, to the extent applicable to federal savings and loan associations in Colorado, all of the rights, powers, privileges, and immunities and shall be subject to the same obligations and duties as an individual fiduciary under like circumstances with power to make investments. All funds held in such fiduciary capacity by any association may be commingled for appropriate purposes of investment, but individual records shall be kept by the fiduciary for each participant and shall show in proper detail all transactions engaged in under the authority of this paragraph (l). An association acting as a trustee may control accounts in or securities of such association pursuant to the exercise of its authority as a trustee. The exercise by an association of any authority vested in it shall not affect any other authority of such association.

To, subject to the regulations of the United States treasury department and the federal office of thrift supervision or its successor, establish a tax and loan account and serve as a depository for federal taxes or as a treasury tax and loan depository, and to satisfy any requirement in connection therewith;

To provide in its articles of incorporation for the elimination or limitation of the personal liability of a director to the corporation or to its stockholders for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director; except that such provision shall not eliminate or limit the liability of a director to the corporation or to its shareholders for monetary damages for: Any breach of the director's duty of loyalty to the corporation or its stockholders; acts or omissions not in good faith or which involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law; or any transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit. No such provision shall eliminate or limit the liability of a director to the corporation or to its shareholders for monetary damages for any act or omission occurring prior to the date when such provision becomes effective.

Pursuant to federal law or under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the financial services board and subject to regulations promulgated by the commissioner of insurance concerning the sale of insurance by savings and loan associations as provided in section 10-2-601, C.R.S., to act as the agent, through the savings and loan association or any service corporation thereof, for any fire, life, or other insurance company authorized to do business in this state by soliciting and selling insurance and collecting premiums on policies issued by such company. For services so rendered, such savings and loan association or service corporation of such savings and loan association may receive such fees or commissions as may be agreed upon between such entity and the insurance company for which it may act as agent.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 295, § 11(1)-(11).

CSA:

C. 25, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-12.

L. 69:

p. 1014, § 5.

L. 71:

p. 1145, § 1.

L. 79:

(1)(m) added, p. 430, § 3, effective June 19.

L. 81:

(1)(l) amended, p. 622, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 87:

(1)(n) added, p. 368, § 6, effective May 20.

L. 97:

(1)(o) added, p. 432, § 9, effective April 24.

L. 2004:

(1)(l) and (1)(m) amended, p. 135, § 13, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Act of 1962", see Pub.L. 87-792, 76 Stat. 809; for the "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974", see Pub.L. 93-406, codified at 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.

11-41-112.5. Savings and loan association as fiduciary.

It is unlawful for a savings and loan association to act as fiduciary, other than as escrow agent, unless it is authorized to do so by the commissioner.

Source:

L. 81:

Entire section added, p. 623, § 2, effective May 18.

11-41-113. Federal home loan bank membership.

Any savings and loan association organized and incorporated under the laws of this state as a savings and loan association that is eligible to become a member of the federal home loan bank, in accordance with the provisions of the act of congress known and cited as the "Federal Home Loan Bank Act", 12 U.S.C. sec. 1421 et seq., approved July 22, 1932, is authorized to subscribe for stock of the federal home loan bank for the district in which it is located and to invest its funds in such stock for the purpose and to the extent required and permitted by the provisions of the "Federal Home Loan Bank Act", 12 U.S.C. sec. 1421 et seq., or any amendment thereto, and is further authorized to furnish to the federal office of thrift supervision or its successor and to the federal home loan bank reports of examinations of such associations made by the commissioner, and is further authorized to consent to an examination to be made by the federal office of thrift supervision or its successor or the federal home loan bank, and is further authorized to do all other things as may be required by the "Federal Home Loan Bank Act", 12 U.S.C. sec. 1421 et seq., or any amendment thereto, necessary to obtain and to continue membership in the federal home loan bank and to obtain advances therefrom or that may be incidental to acquiring or holding membership and to obtaining advances therefrom, and is authorized to assume all the duties, obligations, responsibilities, and liabilities and become entitled to all the benefits provided in the "Federal Home Loan Bank Act", 12 U.S.C. sec. 1421 et seq.

Any savings and loan association has the power to borrow money from the federal home loan bank, when authorized by resolution of its board of directors, upon such terms and rates of interest as may be agreed upon and is authorized to assign and pledge its notes, bonds, mortgages, or other property and to repledge the shares of stock pledged to it as collateral security without securing the consent of the owner thereto as security for the repayment of its indebtedness for money borrowed.

Such pledgee of any note or other evidence of indebtedness due to an association has the right to enforce in its own name or in the name of the association all appropriate remedies to enforce collection, whether or not the shares described in connection with said note are held by such pledgee. Any obligation incurred by or loan made to an association shall constitute a claim against the association's assets and shall be payable in advance of and by preference over all claims or rights of the shareholders or stockholders of such association and shall be prior to and outrank any demand or application for withdrawal or cancellation of all classes of shares or stock or units or certificates in said association including prepaid and matured shares. The existence of a withdrawal list consisting of members desiring to withdraw from the association shall not prevent the board of directors of such association, in its discretion, from borrowing money from the federal home loan bank, to be used for the purpose of making mortgage loans to the members of the association or retiring bank loans, in which event all such amount of borrowed money may be exclusively used for the purpose borrowed or for other purposes, subject to the approval of the commissioner; but no savings and loan association shall at any time borrow money from the federal home loan bank in an amount exceeding any limit fixed by the laws of this state.

Any savings and loan association having funds in its treasury for investment, which funds are deemed by it to be in excess of the amount needed for loans to its members and for the payment of matured shares and withdrawals, has the power to invest such portion of these excess funds in the obligations, bonds, debentures, and other securities of the federal home loan bank; but such investments may not be made in an amount in excess of the limit, if any, provided by the laws of this state for investment of funds in classes of investment other than in mortgage loans to members of the association.

Any officer, director, trustee, attorney, or agent of a savings and loan association, or other borrower, acting as agent for a federal home loan bank in the collection of interest, amortization, or installment payments on collateral deposited with said bank, who applies the proceeds of such collections otherwise than as provided in the agreement with the bank is guilty of theft and shall be subject to the punishment provided by the laws of this state for that offense.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 300, § 11(12).

CSA:

C. 25, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-13.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 136, § 14, effective July 1.

11-41-114. How funds invested.

Any savings and loan association may invest any portion of its funds in any of the following:

Loans to its members, secured by first lien trust deeds or mortgages upon improved real estate, and upon such plans of repayment, as provided in section 11-41-119, and in such other loans to its members as the commissioner may approve;

Bonds and other obligations of, or guaranteed as to interest and principal by, the United States;

Bonds or debentures issued by any federal home loan bank in accordance with the provisions of the "Federal Home Loan Bank Act";

Consolidated federal home loan bank bonds or debentures issued by the federal home loan bank administration in accordance with the provisions of the "Federal Home Loan Bank Act";

Bonds or debentures issued by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor in accordance with the provisions of Title IV of the "National Housing Act", and any amendments thereto;

Insured shares of savings and loan associations to the extent that each investment is insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor and uninsured shares of savings and loan associations but not to exceed ten thousand dollars in any one uninsured association, if such associations are incorporated under the laws of this state or the federal government and are doing business in this state and if such associations are functioning and operating without any restrictions imposed by order of the commissioner or federal home loan bank administration;

Bonds and legal registered warrants as are a direct obligation of the state of Colorado or of any county, city and county, school district, or incorporated city or town therein which has continuously existed as a lawful corporation for a period of at least fifteen years prior to the date thereof and whose bonds have not been in default as to principal or interest for a period of five years prior to the purchase of the same by any savings and loan association;

Other investments, as approved by the commissioner, in which and to the same extent that savings and loan associations, chartered in accordance with the provisions of the "Home Owners' Loan Act of 1933", as amended, may invest;

Capital stock, obligations, or other securities of any corporation, if such corporation is engaged only in such businesses and activities as may be engaged in by corporations whose capital stock is a lawful investment for federal savings and loan associations under the laws, rules, and regulations applicable to all federal savings and loan associations similarly situated. The maximum total investment by any association in any such corporation or combination of corporations shall not exceed the maximum investment which federal savings and loan associations are permitted to maintain in capital stock, obligations, or other securities of similar corporations.

In addition to the maximum total investment provided in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (i), an association may invest an additional three percent of its assets in such corporation or combination of corporations solely for residential real estate development through joint ventures. Nothing in this subparagraph (II) shall authorize participation in such joint ventures conditioned upon utilization of any real property held, directly or indirectly, by such corporation. This subparagraph (II) shall not be construed to authorize such corporation or combination of corporations to invest in real property unless such investment is initiated through a joint venture.

No association organized under the laws of this state shall acquire the capital stock, obligations, or other securities of any such corporation until there has been filed in the office of the commissioner a statement by such corporation agreeing to permit, and pay all costs of, such examinations or audits of the corporation by the commissioner as he deems necessary in order to confirm compliance with the provisions of this paragraph (i).

Investments in real property and obligations secured by liens on real property located within a geographic area or neighborhood receiving concentrated development assistance by a local government under Title I of the "Housing and Community Development Act of 1974", as amended, but no investment in real property may exceed an aggregate investment of two percent of the assets of the association;

Loans as to which the association has the benefit of any guaranty under Title IV of the "Housing and Urban Development Act of 1968", as amended, or under part B of the "National Urban Policy and New Community Development Act of 1970", as amended, or under section 802 of the "Housing and Community Development Act of 1974", as amended, or of a commitment or agreement therefor;

Revenue obligations issued to provide, enlarge, or improve electric power, gas, water, and sewer facilities by any city or town having a population of not less than two thousand people at the time of the investment located in any state in the United States and such investment shall be in accordance with the laws of this state.

In addition to the acceptance of deposit or share accounts, any association may borrow money and negotiate for and receive such long-time or short-time loans evidenced by notes, bonds, debentures, or other securities as may be found necessary to advance the purposes of the association, subject to any limitations as to the total aggregate amount of such borrowings contained in the charter or articles of incorporation of the association or imposed by rules and regulations duly adopted by the commissioner. Except as limited by the terms of its charter or articles of incorporation or by duly adopted rules and regulations of the commissioner, an association may secure such borrowings by the mortgage, pledge, collateral assignment, or other hypothecation of its properties, including a trust or pool or mortgages or other encumbrance held by it. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, an association may issue and sell securities guaranteed pursuant to section 306 (g) of the "National Housing Act", as amended, and may secure such securities as permitted in this subsection (2) and may issue and sell any other guaranteed or unguaranteed securities of a type or kind which may be issued and sold by federal savings and loan associations and secure the same with the property of the association to the same extent as permitted for federal savings and loan associations.

Any association may invest in real estate or interests therein, including buildings and related parking facilities, for use in the conduct of the business of the association or for the conduct of such business and for rental to others of excess space; but no such investment may be made without the prior approval in writing of the commissioner if the total amount of all of such investments made by the association exceeds the aggregate amount of the association's general reserves, undivided profits, and surplus. A permitted investment under the foregoing provision shall be deemed to include the ownership of stock of a wholly-owned subsidiary corporation having as its exclusive activity the ownership and management of such property or interests.

An association may loan an amount not exceeding three percent of the association's assets in a manner not otherwise authorized by articles 40 to 47 of this title, on condition that such loans are related to real estate or housing.

An association may invest in real estate, real estate interests, and real estate related enterprises for the purpose of producing income, for inventory and sale, improvement, or rental by direct purchase or otherwise. The maximum total investment by an association pursuant to this subsection (5) shall not exceed ten percent of its assets reduced by the amount invested by the association in real estate through service corporations pursuant to paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of this section. In connection with such investment, the association may exercise all rights of an owner.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 303, § 11(13).

CSA:

C. 25, § 14.

L. 39:

p. 240, §§ 10, 11.

L. 45:

p. 238, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 122-2-14.

L. 57:

p. 650, § 1.

L. 59:

p. 664, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-2-14.

L. 69:

p. 1014, § 6.

L. 71:

pp. 1145, 1146, §§ 2, 3.

L. 72:

p. 617, § 151.

L. 77:

(4) added, p. 570, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1)(j), (1)(k), and (1)(l) added, p. 431, § 4, effective June 19.

L. 83:

(1)(i) amended, p. 495, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 85:

(5) added, p. 397, § 2, effective May 16.

L. 2004:

(1)(e) and (1)(f) amended, p. 149, § 54, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1)(k) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1044, § 18, effective June 30.

Cross references:

For other legal investments, see §§ 32-4-544 and 32-11-810; for the "Federal Home Loan Bank Act", see Pub.L. 72-304, codified at 12 U.S.C. § 1421 et seq.; for the "National Housing Act", see Pub.L. 73-479, codified at 12 U.S.C. § 1701 et seq.; for the "Home Owners' Loan Act of 1933", see Pub.L. 73-43, codified at 12 U.S.C. § 1461 et seq.; for the "Housing and Community Development Act of 1974", see Pub.L. 93-383, codified at 42 U.S.C. § 5301 et seq.; for the "Housing and Urban Development Act of 1968", see Pub.L. 90-448; for the "National Urban Policy and New Community Development Act of 1970", see Pub.L. 91-609, codified at 42 U.S.C. § 4501 et seq.